Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STUDY OF IMPACT OF EAGLES ON LOONS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must conduct a study of the impact that eagles have on loons in this state. The study must include an assessment of the impact that the presence of bald eagles has on juvenile loons and on the loon population generally. By March 1, 2026, the commissioner must submit a report on the results of the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over the environment. new text end